Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Standard Weights and Measures.

Administrative Code. —

For specifications, tolerances, and regulations for weighing and measuring devices, see 3 AAC 32 and 17 AAC 90.

Sec. 45.75.010.
Systems of weights and measures.

The system of weights and measures in customary use in the United States and the metric system of weights and measures are jointly recognized, and one or the other of these systems shall be used for all commercial purposes in the state. The definitions of basic units of weight and measure, the tables of weight and measure, and weight and measure equivalents, as published by the National Bureau of Standards or its successor organization, the National Institute of Standards and Technology, govern weighing and measuring equipment and transactions in the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 101 SLA 1961; am § 52 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Collateral references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Weights and Measures, § 1 et seq.

94 C.J.S., Weights and Measures, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 45.75.020.
State standards of weight and measure.

The weights and measures obtained by the state in conformity with them and certified by the National Bureau of Standards or its successor organization, the National Institute of Standards and Technology, are the state standards of weight and measure. The state standards shall be kept in a safe and suitable place in the office or laboratory of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. They may not be removed from the office or laboratory except for repairs or for certification. The state standards shall be used only in verifying the office standards and for scientific purposes.

History.

(§ 5 ch 101 SLA 1961; am § 53 ch 50 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 98 § 9 (1997))

Collateral references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Weights and Measures, §§ 4, 10, 19 et seq.